apertium-chv.chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
 
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ

 %{Ӑ%}:ӑ %{Ӑdel%}:ӑ %{ӑ%}:ӑ 

 %{ӗ%}:ӗ %{ӗdel%}:ӗ %{Ӗ%}:ӗ

 %{А%}:а %{а%}:а
 
 %{ь%}:ь %{ч%}:ч %{о%}:о
 
 %{И%}:и %{У%}:у
 
 %{Р%}:р %{Р2%}:р %{М%}:м %{Т%}:р

 %{и%}:и %{и2%}:и %{иdel%}:и

 %{й%}:0 %{Ь%}:0 %{ъ%}:ь %{н2%}:0 %{w%}:0 %{w2%}:0 %{в%}:0

 %>:0 %{н%}:0

 %{р%}:р

 %{Тарах%}:0 %{ТарахAnaliz%}:0

 %{dup%}:0 %{dup2%}:0 %{dup3%}:0 %{nodup%}:0 %{del%}:0 %{ː%}:0 %{ːno3%}:0

 %{RUS%}:0 %{block%}:0

 %+ %- 
 % 

;

Sets

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й
      Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й ;
! no ь, Ь, ъ, Ъ (as the first ones rule in vowel harmony)

SurVow = а ӑ е ё ӗ о у ӳ ы э ю я
         А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я ;

SurVow2 = а ӑ е ӗ о у ӳ ы э 			! no composed vowels я, ю, ё
          А Ӑ Е Ӗ О У Ӳ Ы Э ;

!FrontVow = и ӳ е э ӗ И Ӳ Е Э Ӗ ь Ь %{ӗ%} ;	! ь causes front vowels
FrontVow = И и Ӳ ӳ Е е Э э Ӗ ӗ ;
BackVow =  ы у а ӑ я ю Ы У А Ӑ Я Ю о О ё Ё ;	! Russian о and ё act as back vowels
!FleetingVow = ӗ ӑ Ӗ Ӑ %{ӗ%} ;
! BackNonFleetingVow = BackVow - FleetingVow ;

!AEVow = а А е Е ӑ Ӑ ӗ Ӗ %{ӑ%} %{Ӗ%} %{Ӑ%} ;	! %{Ӑ%} is necessary for some verbal forms
AEVow = а А е Е ӑ Ӑ ӗ Ӗ %{ӑ%} %{Ӗ%} ;	! %{Ӑ%} is necessary for some verbal forms

Soglasnye = Б В Г Д Ж Й З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ 
            б в г д ж й з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ ; 

Sonornye = Б В Г Д Ж Й З Л М Н Р
           б в г д ж й з л м н р ; 

SoglasnyeBezР = Б В Г Д Ж Й З К Л М Н П С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ 
                б в г д ж й з к л м н п с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ ; 

SoglasnyeBezЙЛН = Б В Г Д Ж З К М П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ 
                  б в г д ж з к м п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ ; 

! Gluxye = Soglasnye - Sonornye ;

Glasnye = а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я
          А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я ;

GlasnyeNoУӲ = а ӑ е ё ӗ и о ы э я
              А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О Ы Э Я ;



Rules

!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Ӑ}"
!%{Ӑ%}:ӗ  <=>  FrontVow [ Cns ]* %>:* [ :Cns* [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{А%}: | %{У%}: ]* :Cns* %>:* ]* :Cns* _ ;

!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {А}"
!%{А%}:е  <=>  FrontVow [ Cns ] * %>:* [ :Cns* [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{А%}: | %{У%}: ]* :Cns* %>:* ]* :Cns* _ ;
!	except .#. :Cns :е %>: _ ;

!"Remove archiphoneme in short stems"
!%{А%}:0 <=> .#. :Cns :е %>: _ ;

!"Remove stem final vowel 'a' before archiphoneme in suffix which realises as 'a'"
!а:0 <=>  _ %>: %{А%}:а ;

!!!!! Vowel harmony !!!!!

!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {У}"
!%{У%}:ӳ  <=>  FrontVow [ Cns ]* %>:* [ :Cns* [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{А%}: | %{У%}: ]* :Cns* %>:* ]* :Cns* _ ;
!	except
!                                 %{RUS%}: %>: ;	! {RUS} blocks front vowel harmony

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Ӑ}"
%{Ӑ%}:ӗ <=> [ :FrontVow :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                [ :BackVow ь:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ :0 ] _ ;
!                     [ %{ӗ%}:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ :0 ] _ ;
!                  [ %{ӗdel%}:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ :0 ] _ ;
            except
                             :Glasnye/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                              %{М%}: [ %>: | :0 ]* _ н: .#. ;
!                                        %{Ӑ%}:и/:0 _ н: .#. ;
                                 %{У%}: %{н2%}:/:0 _ н: .#. ;
                                          %{dup%}: _ %>: [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{н%}: | %{У%}: ] ;
!              [ %{dup%}: - %{dup%}:0 ] %{Ӑ%}:0 %>: _ %{н%}: ;
!                      [ %{dup%}: - %{dup%}:0 ] %>: _ %{н%}: ;
!!JWNTMP            [ %{dup%}: - %{dup%}:0 ] (%{Ӑ%}:0) %>: _ %{н%}: ;
!                 [ %{dup%}: - %{dup%}:0 ]/[ %>: ] _ %{н%}: ;
!                         [ %{dup%}: - %{dup%}:0 ] _ ;
                                          %{dup%}: _ [ %>: | :0 ] :Soglasnye ;
               [ %{Ь%}: :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
       \ӗ: %{RUS%}:/[ [ :0 - ӗ:0 ] | :Soglasnye* ] _ ;

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {ӑ}"
%{ӑ%}:ӗ <=> [ :FrontVow :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - ӗ:0 ] ] _ ;
                [ :BackVow ь:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ [ :0 - ӗ:0 ] ] _ ;
                                          :Soglasnye ӗ:0 %>: _ ;  ! чик{ː}ӗ>{ӑ}н:чиккӗн
            except
                             :Glasnye/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;  ! deletes
                                                   _ %{RUS%}: %>: [ %{У%}: | %{Ӗ%}: | %{Ӑ%}: ] ; ! deletes
                              %{М%}: [ %>: | :0 ]* _ н: .#. ;
!JNWTMP                                        %{Ӑ%}:и/:0 _ н: .#. ;
                                 %{У%}: %{н2%}:/:0 _ н: .#. ;
                                          %{dup%}: _ %>: [ %{Ӑ%}: | %{н%}: | %{У%}: ] ;
!!JNWTMP            [ %{dup%}: - %{dup%}:0 ] (%{Ӑ%}:0) %>: _ %{н%}: ;
                                          %{dup%}: _ [ %>: | :0 ] :Soglasnye ;
     [ %{Ь%}: :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - ӗ:0 ] ] _ ;
       \ӗ: %{RUS%}:/[ [ :0 - ӗ:0 ] | :Soglasnye* ] _ ;
!JNWTMPWTF                           :Soglasnye/[ :0 - ӗ:0 ] _ ;
                                                   _ (%{RUS%}:) .#. ; ! avoid conflict with "Final unstressed а in Russian loans"

!!! JNW TEMP
!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Ӑdel}"
!%{Ӑdel%}:ӗ <=> [ :FrontVow :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!              [ FrontVow:0 :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;		! кӗсье<n><px2pl><nom> = кӗсьӗр
!                   [ :BackVow ь:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ :0 ] _ ;
!!                       [ %{ӗ%}:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ :0 ] _ ;
!!                    [ %{ӗdel%}:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ :0 ] _ ;
!            except
!                 [ %{Ь%}: :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!                       %{RUS%}:/[ :0 | :Soglasnye* ] _ ;

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {А}"
%{А%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
           [ FrontVow:0 :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;		! кӗнеке<n><px2sg><dat>: кӗнекӳне
!             [ %{Ӗ%}:0 :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;		! училище<n><px2sg><dat>: училищӳне
                [ :BackVow ь:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ :0 ] _ ;
!                     [ %{ӗ%}:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ :0 ] _ ;
!                  [ %{ӗdel%}:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ :0 ] _ ;
                     ӗ:0 :Soglasnye*/[ :0 - ӗ:0 ]* _ ;
!              [ %{ӗ%}:0 :Soglasnye* ]/[  %>: :0 ] _ ;		! хыҫ<n><px3sp><dat> = хыҫ·н·е
!               %{ӗ%}:0 %{н%}: %{w%}%: %>: %{н%}%: _ ;		! хыҫ<n><px3sp><dat> = хыҫ·н·е
!%<px3sp%>:%>%{dup%}%{ӗ%}%{н%} POS-INFL ;
!%<dat%>:%{w%}%>%{н%}%{А%} COP ;
        except 
	            [ %{Ь%}: :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                      [ :BackVow й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;		! сарай>а = сарая
                      [ й: %{RUS%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;		! герой>а = героя
!                    :SoglasnyeBezР %>:* %{Тарах%}: _ р ;	! FIXME: This can't solve a strange rule conflict
!                          :Glasnye %>:* %{Тарах%}: _ р ;
                                   %>: %{Тарах%}:0 _ р ;   ! Maybe this'll fix the conflict?
            :SoglasnyeBezЙЛН %>:* %{ТарахAnaliz%}: _ р ;	! FIXME: This can't solve a strange rule conflict
                    :Glasnye %>:* %{ТарахAnaliz%}: _ р ;
       \ӗ: %{RUS%}: %{w%}:* %>: [ :Soglasnye* ]/[ :0 - ӗ:0 ] _ ;	! {RUS} blocks front vowel harmony, (except with final ӗ?)

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {a}"
%{а%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Soglasnye* [ :Soglasnye | й:0 ] ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - й:0 ] ] _ ;
!            [ :FrontVow :Soglasnye* :Soglasnye ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!                   [ :FrontVow :Soglasnye* й:0 ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! кил<v><iv><abil><pres><p1><sg>: килеетеп
!  COMBINED above
                [ :BackVow ь:/:Soglasnye* :Soglasnye ]/[ :0 ] _ ;
                                          [ :и ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! ҫи<v><iv><pres><p1><sg>: ҫиетӗп (e = /йэ/)
	except
                              [ :BackVow й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; ! сарай>а = сарая
                             [ \:ӗ %{RUS%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; ! герой>а = героя, политик%{ӑ%}>ах = политиках

"Reduction of unstressed vowels in Russian loans"
Vx:Vy <=> _ [ %{RUS%}: :Cns ]/[ %>:0 | %{Ь%}: | %{w%}: | %{н%}: ] ;
		except _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: ӗ: ;
          where Vx in ( е а я )
                Vy in ( ӗ ӑ ь )
                matched ;

"Unstressed vowels after ь in Russian loans"
%{RUS%}:Vy <=> Vx:ь/%>: _ :Cns/[ %>: | %{Ь%}: | %{w%}: | %{н%}: ] ;
               where Vx in ( я )
                     Vy in ( ӑ )
                     matched ;

!!!!JNW TEMP
!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {У}"
!%{У%}:ӳ <=>       [ :FrontVow :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - е:0 ] ] _ ;
!!                        [ е:0 :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - е:0 ] ] _ ;		! кӗсье<n><px2sg><nom> = кӗсье>{dup}{У}{н2} = кӗсйӳ (seems to be innecessary, but there is a double generation: кӗсйӳ/кӗсьу)
!!                        [ ӗ:0 :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 ] _ ;		! анне<n><px2sg><nom> = анӗ>{dup}{У}{н2} = аннӳ
!!                    [ %{Ӗ%}:0 :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: |:0 ] _ ;		! училище<n><px2sg><dat> = училищ{Ӗ}>{dup}{У}{н2}{w}>{н}{А} = училищӳне
!!          These three have been condensed into the following:
!                  [ е:0 | ӗ:0 | %{Ӗ%}:0 ] [ :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ е:0 | ӗ:0 | %{Ӗ%}:0 ] ] ] _ ;
!    [ :BackVow :Soglasnye* ь: :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: |:0 ] _ ;		! супӑнь<n><px2sg><nom> = супӑнь>{dup}{У}{н2} = супанӳ, тетрадь<n><px2sg><nom> = тетрадь>{dup}{У}{н2} = тетрадӳ
!            except
!                 ! _ [ %{н%}: %{w%}:0 %{н%}: %{А%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] .#. ;
!                 _ %{н2%}: %{w%}:0 %>: %{н%}: %{А%}: .#. ;
!		[ :BackVow й: :0* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;			! сарай>у = сараю
!!      [ :FrontVow :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %{w%}:в %>: %{н%}: %{А%}: ;
!            [ :FrontVow :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 - [ е:0 | ӗ:0 | %{Ӗ%}:0 ] ] _ %{w%}:в %>: %{н%}: %{А%}: ;
!          [ :BackVow ь:/:Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | :0 - [ е:0 | ӗ:0 | %{Ӗ%}:0 ] ] _ [ %{w%}:в [ %{А%}: | %{Ӑ%}: ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ];
!                          \:ӗ %{RUS%}: [ %>: | :0 ]* _  ;			! {RUS} blocks front vowel harmony

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {У}"
%{У%}:ӳ <=> [ :FrontVow :Soglasnye* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - е:0 ] ] _ ;
                                                 ь:0/[ %>: ] _ ;   ! июнь>{У}{н}:июнӳ
        except
        ! contexts below taken straight from й>{У} rule
!            [ :BackVow й: :0* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! сарай>у = сараю
!       [ :BackVow й: %{RUS%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! герой>у = герою
        [ й: %{ӑ%}: %{RUS%}:  ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! аллей%{ӑ%}%{RUS%}>у = аллею
    [ %{ъ%}: %{ӑ%}: %{RUS%}:  ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;	! Жен%{ъ%}%{ӑ%}%{RUS%}>у = Женю


"ь in the stem to й before и/е in affix (orthographic incompatibility)"
ь:й <=>         _ :0* %>: [ :и ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;				! плать{Ӗ}>%{dup%}%{в%}%{ӗ%}%{н%}: платйи
                _ е:0 :0* %>: [ :и | :ӗ | :ӳ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;		! кӗсье<n><px2sg><nom> = кӗсйӳ, кӗсье<n><px2pl><nom> = кӗсйӗр, кӗсье<n><px3sp> = кесйи
                _ %{Ӗ%}:0 :0* %>: [ :ӗ | :ӳ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;		! платье<n><dat> = плать{Ӗ}%{w%}%>%{н%}%{А%}: платйӗне
	except
          Cns:  _ :0* %>: [ :е ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;				! супӑнь<n><dat>: супӑне, тетрадь<n><dat>: тетраде
          Cns:  _ :0* %>: [ %>: | :0 ]* Cns: :FrontVow/[ %>: | :0 ] ;	! июль<n><px3sp><dat> = июль>{dup}{в}{ӗ}{н}{w}>{н}{А} = июлне
    [ т: | д: ] _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: ӗ: ;		! "ть > ч in px3sp (2): тетрадь > тетраче"
с: [ т: | д: ]* _ %{RUS%}:* %{w%}:* %>: ;				! власть > влаҫ, ересь > ереҫ in all composites
!          Cns: _ %{RUS%}: %>: ;					! to avoid conflict with Final ь in Russian loans

"No ь before a harmonised front vowel which is not и, е"
ь:0 <=>        _ :0* %>: [ :ӗ | :ӳ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;			! супӑнь<n><px2sg><nom> = супӑнь>{dup}{У}{н2} = супанӳ, тетрадь<n><px2sg><nom> = тетрадь>{dup}{У}{н2} = тетрадӳ
         Cns:  _ :0* %>: [ :е ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;				! супӑнь<n><dat>: супӑне, тетрадь<n><dat>: тетраде
        except
!            т: _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: %{ӗ%}: ;			! ҫурть<n><px3sp><nom> = ҫурчӗ
!            д: _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: %{ӗ%}: ;			! тетрадь<n><px3sp><nom> = тетрадӗ
!   COMBINED below:
!   [ д: | т: ] _ %{RUS%}:* %>: %{dup%}: %{в%}: %{ӗ%}: ;
   [ д: | т: ] _ %{RUS%}:* %>: [ :0 - %{ӗ%}:0 ] %{ӗ%}: ;
